Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 29
DRAINAGE DISTRICTS

Sec.

§ 42-2901. Corporate powers of drainage districts.

Any portion of a county requiring drainage or diking, or both, may be organized into a drainage district, and when so organized such district and the board of commissioners hereinafter provided for shall have and possess the power herein conferred by law upon such district and board of commissioners, and said district shall be known and designated as drainage district No. . . . . (here insert number) of the county of . . . . (here insert name of county), of the state of Idaho, and shall have the right to sue and be sued by and in the name of its board of commissioners hereinafter provided for, and shall have perpetual succession and shall adopt and use a seal. The commissioners hereinafter provided for and their successors in office shall, from the time of the organization of such drainage district, have the power and it shall be their duty, to manage and conduct the business and affairs of the district, and make and execute all necessary contracts, employ and appoint such agents, officers and employees as may be required, and prescribe their duties, and perform such other acts as herein provided, or that may hereafter be provided by law.

Parties to Suits.

Where water owned by an irrigation district was involved in litigation, it was not necessary that the water users in such district be joined as parties litigant thereto. Nampa & Meridian Irrigation Dist. v. Barclay, 56 Idaho 13, 47 P.2d 916 (1935).

§ 42-2902. Appropriation of water available for irrigation purposes.

The boards of commissioners of drainage districts are hereby authorized and empowered to file upon and appropriate in the manner provided by law, waters created or made available for irrigation purposes, by the construction of drainage works within such district, whenever the same can be applied to a beneficial use upon lands within the district, without impairing prior existing rights, which waters shall be equitably and ratably distributed in the manner provided by law to lands within the district which may beneficially use the same in the proportion that the assessment for drainage of each tract of said land bears to the whole assessment within the district: provided, that where lands within the district have an adequate water right and the water made available for irrigation by the construction of such works, may be beneficially used upon other lands within the district, the board of commissioners may supply such lands with water, upon their assuming to pay their proportionate share of the drainage assessments, and credit other lands within the district creating such water supply with their ratable proportion, of the actual cost of the delivery thereof.

§ 42-2903. Appropriation of irrigation waters — Assessments for expenses.

The board of commissioners of drainage districts are hereby authorized and empowered to assess upon lands within the district, benefited by such filing and appropriation as provided in section 42-2902[, Idaho Code], a sufficient amount to pay the expenses thereof, which shall be levied and collected in the same manner as funds are now levied and collected for the maintenance of the drainage works and the funds so obtained may be expended for the purposes authorized by this act.

§ 42-2904. Municipality may act as drainage district.

Any village or city already incorporated, or which may hereafter be incorporated, may exercise the functions of a drainage district under the provisions of this chapter, or the whole or any portion of any such village or city may be included with other territory in a common district under the provisions for the establishment thereof as provided for herein.

§ 42-2905. Petition for organization.

For the purpose of the formation of such drainage district a petition shall be presented to the clerk of the district court of the county in which a greater portion of the lands of said proposed district are located, which petition shall set forth the object of the organization of said district, shall designate temporary boundaries thereof and shall set forth approximately the number of acres of land therein, and shall contain a description of the proposed system of drainage or diking or both, designating the point or points, if any there may be, which shall be the outlet or outlets for the drainage of said district, the general route over which the main ditch or ditches are to be constructed, together with the proposed spurs or branches, and the general location of the dikes or levees, if any there may be, and set forth the further fact that the establishment of said district and the proposed system of drainage will be conducive to the public health, convenience and welfare, or increase the public revenue, or that the establishment of said district and the said system of drainage and reclamation is a proper and advantageous method of accomplishing the relief sought. Said petition shall be signed by such number as own at least one-third of the acreage in the proposed district, and shall pray that the same be organized under the provisions of this chapter. Community property may be represented by either the husband or the record owner.

§ 42-2906. Petition — Bond — Condition for withdrawal of names.

Said petitioners shall, at the time of the filing of the petition, file a bond with the clerk of the district court of the county in which said proposed district is located, running to the state of Idaho, in the penal sum of $500.00, with two or more sureties, to be approved by the judge of the district court, conditioned that they will pay all costs in case said district for any reason shall not be established.

In case said district be not established, then all costs and expenses shall be collectible on the bond hereinbefore provided for, and any person having a charge against said district shall have a right of action thereon: provided, that when said petition is filed with the clerk of said court no petitioner shall be allowed to withdraw his name or land therefrom without tendering into court his pro rata share of all costs and expenses incurred by petitioners to the date of said withdrawals.

§ 42-2907. Action on petition — Notice of hearing.

After the filing of said petition the judge of the court shall fix a time for the hearing of said petition by order made by him, which order shall provide that said petition be published for at least three (3) successive weeks in some weekly newspaper or newspapers, printed and published in said county or counties in which the lands are situated, and in case no such paper is published in such county, then in some paper of general circulation therein; together with a notice of the time and place at which said judge will consider said petition.

§ 42-2908. Hearing — Objections — Findings.

Upon the day fixed for the hearing of said petition, any persons or corporation interested therein, may appear before said court and make objections to the organization and incorporation of said district, but such objections shall be limited to determining whether or not the organization of such drainage district is a proper and advantageous method of accomplishing the reclamation and protection of the swamped, bogged or water-logged lands, or lands subject to overflow therein, and whether or not there is a reasonable probability that the objects sought by the formation of the district may be accomplished, and whether or not said proposed drainage system will be conducive either to the public health, welfare or convenience or increase the public revenue; and at the hearing the court shall hear and consider such evidence only as may be presented for or against the petition or objections thereto. Thereupon the court shall make its findings upon the facts alleged in the petition and objections and any other facts necessary and proper for the determination of the propriety of the organization of such district, and if said district be organized, the judge of said court shall cause an order to be entered and recorded in the judgment record of each of the counties in which the lands within said district are situated, setting forth the facts found by the said judge upon the hearing of said petition, and said order shall define the temporary boundaries of said district and describe the lands included therein by township, range and section only, and shall have the effect of a lis pendens.

Any district may be established even if it is shown that the outlet for the drainage system is without the county or counties in which said district is located, or without the boundaries of the state of Idaho, or is in any other state or territory, or in a foreign country; the work for the drainage of said district may be contracted for and performed either entirely or partially within the limits of any other state, territory or foreign country.

§ 42-2909. Decree.

Upon the entry of the findings of the final hearing of said petition, as set forth in the last preceding section, said judge of the district court of the county in which the proposed drainage district is located, if he finds said proposed drainage system to be conducive either to the public health, welfare or convenience, or will increase the public revenue, or be of special benefit to the majority in acreage of the lands included in said boundaries, shall declare said district duly organized, and to be known as drainage district No. . . . . (here insert number) of the county of . . . . (here insert name of county), in the state of Idaho. The clerk of said district court shall cause a copy of the order declaring said district to be organized, duly certified, to be filed in the office of the secretary of state, and from and after the date of said filing, said organization shall be deemed complete.

§ 42-2910. Appointment of drainage commissioners — Qualification — Bond — Oath — Organization of board.

The judge of the district court within ten (10) days thereafter shall appoint three (3) drainage commissioners. The commissioners shall be appointed from among those living in the county where said proposed district is located.

The board of drainage commissioners appointed as aforesaid shall be entitled to enter upon the duties of their office upon qualifying as county officers are required to qualify, and upon each drainage commissioner giving a bond to the state of Idaho, for the benefit of said drainage district, for the faithful performance of his duties as such drainage commissioner, in the penal sum of $5000, with one or more sureties to be approved by the judge of the district court. Provided that the judge of the district court, upon application and proper showing by the board of drainage commissioners, may enter an order reducing the penalty of the bond to such sum as may appear to him to be reasonable and adequate under the showing made. The drainage commissioners shall take the oath of office and file their bonds within fifteen (15) days after they are appointed; and they shall hold office until their successors are duly appointed and qualified. Each drainage commissioner thereafter who may be appointed shall enter into a like bond and of like effect upon entering upon his duties, which bond shall be approved by the judge of the district court of the county in which said drainage district is located. The bonds of the drainage commissioners shall be filed with the clerk of the district court and kept in his custody. Immediately after their appointment and their bonds have been filed and approved, the drainage commissioners shall organize themselves into a board, and they shall by lot determine the terms of their office, which shall be one (1), two (2) or three (3) years respectively. Annually thereafter the judge of the district court of the county in which said district is located shall appoint one (1) drainage commissioner whose term of office shall be for three (3) years.

§ 42-2911. Officers — Meetings.

The board of commissioners of such district shall elect one of their number chairman and one secretary, and shall keep minutes of all their proceedings. The drainage commissioners shall hold their meetings for the transaction of business at any place in the county or counties in which the district is located.

§ 42-2912. Vacancies.

In case a vacancy or vacancies occur in said board by death, failure to appoint, failure to qualify, or resignation of one or more of the members thereof, such vacancy or vacancies shall be filled at once by appointment by the judge of the district court of the county in which said district is located, and said appointee shall serve for the unexpired term, or until his successor is appointed and his bond approved.

§ 42-2913. Compensation.

The drainage commissioners shall receive for their services such sum as the board of drainage district commissioners fix by resolution for each day they shall actually be engaged in the business of their office, and actual and necessary expenses. In addition, the commissioners shall each receive a mileage allowance computed at the rate established by the state board of examiners for employees of the state for each mile driven and such allowance shall be the full amount allowed for travel expense.

§ 42-2914. Examination of lands — Report of commissioners — Apportionment and reapportionment of benefits and damages.

As soon as may be after their appointment, or within such time as the court may direct, the commissioners shall examine the lands described in the petition and proposed to be drained and protected, and the lands over and upon which the work is proposed to be constructed and shall determine and report:

Whether the starting point, route and terminus of the proposed work and the proposed location thereof, is or are in all respects proper and feasible, and if not, what is or are so.

The estimated cost of the proposed work, including all incidental expenses and the cost of proceedings therefor.

The probable cost of keeping the same in repair after the work is completed.

What lands will be injured thereby and the aggregate amount of such injuries; and they shall award to each tract or lot, by whomsoever held, the amount of damage so determined by them.

What lands will be benefited by the construction of the proposed work, whether the benefits will equal or exceed the aggregate cost of constructing such work, including all incidental expenses, costs of proceedings and damages; and they shall apportion and assess the estimated cost of the same on the lands so benefited by setting opposite the correct description of each tract, lot or easement, the portion of such cost assessed as benefits thereon. And if any particular part of the work so proposed to be done shall be assessed upon any particular tracts or lots of land or upon any municipality or corporation they shall so specify; and if any municipality or corporation should in their judgment bear a part of the expense or as such will derive a public or special benefit from the whole or any part of such proposed work, they shall so report and assess the amount of such benefits.

Whether the proposed district, as set out in the petition filed, will embrace all the lands that may be damaged or benefited by the proposed work, and if not, what additional lands will be benefited or damaged and the amount of the benefits or damages in the same manner as though such lands were included in such original petition.

If the commissioners determine the lands benefited or the amount of said benefits has either changed or is in error, the commissioners may petition the court to reapportion the benefits to part or all of the lands within the district. Upon receipt of a petition, the court shall make and enter an order fixing a time and place when and where all persons interested may appear and object to the reapportionment of benefits, and the clerk of the court shall cause publication of the order in three (3) consecutive weekly issues in a newspaper of general circulation within each county in which any of the lands for which reapportionment of benefits is sought are located. Any landowner affected by the reapportionment of benefits may object against the whole or any part of the reapportionment pursuant to the provisions of section 42-2920, Idaho Code. Upon a hearing pursuant to the provisions of section 42-2921, Idaho Code, the court shall issue an order setting forth the reapportionment of benefits, if any.

§ 42-2915. Assessment of benefits against high lands.

In determining the amount which each tract of land will be benefited by such proposed drainage system the commissioners shall consider the damage done to low land from seepage and saturation by irrigation water from high land, and the necessity for the carrying off of waste water, and such high lands shall be considered as being benefited to the extent and in the amount that such lands are responsible for damage to low lands from seepage and saturation by irrigation water.

§ 42-2916. Duties of engineers and surveyors — Preliminary survey.

For the purpose of compiling the data to be presented to the court as set forth in the preceding sections, the board of commissioners of said drainage district may employ one or more competent engineers, surveyors and other helpers, and such legal assistance as may be necessary, with full power to bind said district for the compensation of such assistants or employees employed: provided, however, that all maps, profiles, surveys, plans, specifications or other data heretofore made or property acquired under laws heretofore enacted on the subject may be purchased and used under the provisions of this chapter.

§ 42-2917. Changes in original plans.

The commissioners shall not be confined to the point of commencement, route or terminus of any drain or ditch, or the number, extent or size of the same, or the location, plan or extent of any levee, ditch or other work as proposed by the petitioners, but shall locate, lay out and plan the same in such manner as to them shall seem best designed to promote the public health or welfare and to drain or protect the lands of the parties interested with the least damage and the greatest benefit to all lands to be affected thereby; any plan proposed by the commissioners may, on the application of any person interested, on the hearing hereinafter provided for, or on the application of the commissioners, be altered by the court, by written order, in such manner as shall appear to the court to be just.

§ 42-2918. Alteration of boundaries.

If the commissioners find that the proposed district, as described in the petition filed, will not embrace all of the lands that will be benefited by the proposed work, or that it will include lands that will not be benefited and not necessary to be included in said district for any purpose, they may extend or contract the boundaries of the proposed district so as to include or exclude all such lands, as the case may be; and the boundaries adopted and reported by them may, upon the hearing of their report as hereinafter provided, upon their application or that of any person interested, be altered by the court in such manner as shall appear to be just: provided, the alteration of boundaries as aforesaid shall not have the effect of so far enlarging or contracting the proposed district as to render such petition void or dismissable.

§ 42-2919. Report of intention to do work — Notice of hearing on confirmation.

If the commissioners shall find after the investigation referred to that the cost, expenses and damages are more than equal to the increased value which will accrue to the lands within the district, they shall so report and the proceedings shall be dismissed. But if the commissioners shall report that the whole cost of the work including preliminary surveys and expenses, legal assistance and court costs will be less than the increase in value to accrue therefrom, they shall so report to the court, and the court shall then make and enter an order fixing a time and place when and where all persons interested may appear and contest the confirmation thereof, and the clerk of the court shall cause notices of the time and place of said hearing to be given to all parties interested by the publication of a notice thereof for at least three successive weeks prior to the date set for such hearing in one or more newspapers published in said county or counties which notice shall contain a description of all land affected and the amount of the assessments and damages awarded in said report and by personally serving or sending by registered mail a copy of said notice to each landowner at his post-office address in so far as the same can be ascertained, and if not known, then to their last known post-office address, at least twenty days before the date appointed for said hearing, but failure to receive such notice shall not invalidate any assessment.

§ 42-2920. Objections.

Any of the landowners or any person or corporation affected by the work proposed may appear on the day set for hearing said report and remonstrate against the whole or any part of the proposed work. Such remonstrance shall be verified by affidavit, and shall set forth the objections of the affiant, whether they go to the jurisdiction of the commissioners or the court or not, or whether they rest on any other fact, as that some lands are assessed too high or too low or improperly, or that lands are assessed which ought not to be, or that lands should be assessed which are not assessed, or that the plans for said proposed work should be changed, or that the boundaries of said district should be altered so as to include or exclude certain lands, or by any persons or corporations to whom damages are allowed that they are inadequate, or by any person or municipality that the public health or welfare will not be promoted by the proposed work.

§ 42-2921. Hearing on confirmation.

The remonstrants shall set forth objections to the confirmation of the report of the commissioners by stating separately, first, legal objections, second, issues of fact to be tried by the court, third, issues of fact to be tried by the jury. The district court of said county shall fix a time for the hearing of the objections giving such proceedings preference over other civil actions pending, and on demand of any person or corporation assessed for the cost of construction or awarded damages, may impanel a jury and take its verdict upon the trial of such issue, whether the amount of damages awarded by the commissioners is adequate, or whether the assessment of any remonstrant demanding the review is too high, and the court or jury may assess the same. All other issues arising on remonstrance shall be tried by the court, and if the court finds that the report requires modification the same may be referred to the commissioners who may be required to modify it in any respect. The report of the commissioners shall be prima facie evidence of the allegations therein set forth and the remonstrants shall be considered as plaintiffs and have the burden of establishing their objections thereto. In any case between the commissioners and any remonstrant the court may award and apportion the costs; costs awarded against the commissioners shall be paid out of the funds realized for the assessments made.

§ 42-2922. Findings and decree.

If the findings be awarded against the validity of the proceedings the same may be dismissed. If the findings be in favor of the validity of the proceedings, the court, after the report shall have been modified to conform to the findings, or if there be no remonstrances, shall confirm the same, and the order of confirmation shall be final and conclusive, the proposed work shall be established and authorized and the proposed assessments approved subject to the right of appeal to the supreme court.

§ 42-2923. Supplemental report.

The court may also permit the commissioners to present and file a supplemental report as to any matter which, pursuant to the provisions of section 42-2914[, Idaho Code,] might have been included in the original report presented by them, and after reasonable notice given to parties adversely interested in such manner as the court may direct, the court may, upon the hearing in the matter, make such order as the same may require.

§ 42-2924. Appeals.

Every person or corporation feeling himself or itself aggrieved by the judgment for damages or the assessment for benefits may appeal to the supreme court of this state in the manner provided by law for appeals in civil actions to the Supreme Court within thirty days after the entry of the judgment confirming the report of the commissioners; and such appeal shall bring before the supreme court the propriety and justness of the amount of damages or assessment of benefits in respect to the parties to the appeal. Upon such appeal no bond shall be required and no stay shall be allowed.

§ 42-2925. Procedure on dismissal of proceedings.

In case the report of the commissioners hereinbefore provided for shall not be confirmed upon the hearing of the objections and remonstrances thereto, the court or judge shall dismiss such proceedings and in such case judgment shall be rendered for the costs and expenses of said proceedings against said district, and no further proceedings shall be had or done thereon; and in that event the commissioners within thirty (30) days after such dismissal shall file with the clerk of the court a statement of all costs and expenses incurred by them which statement shall be itemized and verified by the oath of one (1) of the commissioners: provided, that in case of such dismissal the said commissioners shall have the right of appeal to the Supreme Court and such appeal shall be taken in the same manner as provided for in section 42-2924[, Idaho Code].

§ 42-2926. Procedure for payment of damages awarded — Determination of conflicting claims.

Any person or corporation claiming to be entitled to any money ordered paid by the court, as provided in this chapter, may apply to the court therefor and upon furnishing evidence satisfactory to the court that he be entitled to the same, the court shall make an order directing the payment to such claimant of the portion of such money as he or it may be found entitled to; but, if upon application, the court or judge thereof shall decide that the title to the land, real estate or premises specified in the application of such claimants is in such condition as to require that an action be commenced to determine the title of claimants thereto, it shall refuse such order until such action is commenced and the conflicting claims to such land, real estate or premises be determined according to law.

§ 42-2927. Lands of state and its subdivisions.

All state, county, school district or other lands belonging to other public corporations requiring drainage shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter, and such corporations, by and through the proper authorities, shall be made parties in all proceedings herein affecting said lands, and shall have the same rights as private persons, and their lands shall be subject to the rights of eminent domain the same as the lands of private persons or corporations.

§ 42-2928. Lands of state and its subdivisions — Assessment.

In case lands belonging to the state, county, school district or other public corporation are benefited by any improvement instituted under the provisions of this chapter, all benefits shall be assessed against said lands, and the same shall be paid by the proper authorities of such public corporations at the same time and in the same manner as assessments are called and paid in cases of private persons, out of any general fund of such corporations.

§ 42-2929. Subsequent assessment of public lands.

In case there are any lands included in any drainage district which cannot be assessed because of the title being in the United States government, or because of it being land not yet proved up on [upon], or being Indian land, or for any other reason, then in that event, the drainage commissioners are, at any future date when said lands come under the jurisdiction of the drainage district, authorized to assess said lands for all benefits bestowed, the same as though said lands were originally assessable, and notice of the intention to so assess together with the amounts of assessment filed by the drainage commissioners with the recorder of the county in which said district is located, shall be notice to all subsequent purchasers and encumbrancers.

§ 42-2930. Additional levy — Notice.

In the event that the amount levied shall be insufficient to complete the contemplated improvement, then the board shall levy an additional assessment sufficient to complete the same, including the cost of collection, and all legal and other proceedings in connection therewith. Such additional levy shall be made against the same property, and in the same proportion against each, as was the original levy, and after approval thereof by the judge, before whom said proceedings are pending, shall be spread on the books of the auditor and tax collector in the same manner as is required in the case of the original levy. A brief general notice of the filing of the application for confirmation of such additional levy shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in each of the counties in which such district is situate, at least once each week, for three (3) consecutive weeks prior to the date fixed for confirmation.

§ 42-2931. Additional construction work and assessments.

In any case where the work set out in the plan for drainage as provided in this chapter, or the work or improvements and the system of diking and reclamation constructed or in process of construction, are deemed or found by the board of commissioners of any drainage district at any time before or after the completion thereof to be insufficient or inadequate for any reason or by reason of any occurrence or circumstance, said board may order and cause to be done and constructed (in the manner provided and permitted by this chapter and subject to the judicial proceedings required by this chapter) additional work and improvements for the purpose of rendering sufficient and adequate the work and improvements and system of reclamation and drainage already constructed or for the purpose of reconstructing and for the preservation of the same; and also in any case where in the judgment of said board, new, additional or separate works and improvements (in the nature of original construction or reconstruction work and improvements) shall be or become necessary for the sufficient, safe and adequate drainage and reclamation of said district or for the safety and preservation of the work, improvements and system already constructed, said board may order and cause to be done and constructed such new, additional and separate works and improvements; and a new estimate of benefits may be made in each and all of said cases based on the additional or separate additional work or construction or reconstruction work proposed; and additional assessments for each or all of such additional or separate works and improvements may be made on the lands benefits in conformity with the procedure provided in this chapter as in the case of original construction; and the lands in said district, or any part of such lands, shall be assessed in proportion to the benefits estimated as accruing to such lands because of such additional or separate work and improvements or because of such separate or additional construction and reconstruction work and improvements. The provisions of chapter 29[, title 42, Idaho Code,] shall apply to all proceedings had or matters or things done pursuant to the authorization of this section, the necessary substitutions and changes being made because of any variant circumstances.

§ 42-2932. Fees for service of process.

Fees for service of all process necessary to be served under the provisions of this chapter shall be the same as for like services in other civil cases, or as is or may be provided by law.

§ 42-2933. District court may enforce chapter.

The district court may compel the performance of the duties imposed by this chapter, and may, in its discretion, on proper application therefor, issue its mandatory injunction for such purpose.

§ 42-2934. Assessments — When incontestable.

The collection of any assessments of benefits made by the commissioners and confirmed by the court shall not be restrained or obstructed by reason of any omission, imperfection or defect in the organization of any district or in any proceedings occurring prior to the order confirming the assessments of benefits, but such order shall be conclusive as to the regularity of all proceedings relating to the assessments of benefits unless appealed from within thirty (30) days after the entry of such order.

§ 42-2935. Assessment roll.

Upon the entering of the order confirming the apportionment of costs and awarding of damages as hereinbefore provided for, the clerk of said court shall immediately prepare a transcript which shall contain a list of all lands which are so assessed and awarded damages in said report and shall certify the same to the recorder of the county in which said lands are situated and said statement so certified shall specify the amount of the assessment upon each tract, parcel or governmental subdivision, and shall describe all rights of way or easements required by the district and the amount of damages awarded to the owners thereof; and the said county recorder shall thereupon enter such order of record and the same shall be notice of a lien of said assessment of all persons, and shall establish the right of way and easement of the district in and to the lands so described and said district shall be thereafter entitled to enter upon and occupy said lands upon the payment to the owner of the amount of damage so awarded.

§ 42-2936. Assessments entered as tax liens — Installments.

A similar transcript duly certified by the clerk which shall contain a list of the names of all persons and corporations benefited by said improvement and the amount of the assessment upon each lot, parcel or governmental subdivision shall be by said clerk filed with the auditor of the county, who shall immediately enter the same upon the tax rolls of his office, as provided by law for the entry of other taxes, against the land of each of the said persons named in the list, together with the amounts thereof; and the same shall be subject to the same interest and penalties in case of delinquency as in case of general taxes and shall be collected in the same manner as other taxes and subject to the same right of redemption, and the lands sold for the collection of said taxes shall be subject to the same right of redemption, as the sale of lands for general taxes; provided, that said assessment shall not become due and payable except at such time or times and in such amounts as may be designated by the board of commissioners of said drainage district, which designation shall be made to the county auditor by said board of commissioners of said drainage district, by serving written notice upon the county auditor designating the time and the amount of the assessment, said assessment to be in proportion to the benefits to become due and payable, which amount shall fall due at the time of the falling due of general taxes, and the amount so designated shall be added by the auditor to the general taxes of said person, persons or corporation, according to said notice, upon the assessment rolls in his said office, and collected therewith: provided further, that no one call for assessment for the payment or retirement of any bonds or warrants by said commissioners shall be in amount to exceed twenty percent (20%) of the actual amount necessary to pay the cost of proceedings, and the establishment of said district and drainage system and the cost of construction of said work. In all calls for assessments made under the provisions hereof for the payment or retirement of any bonds or warrants issued subsequent to February 25, 1935, the commissioners shall itemize the various items for which a call is made, specifying the percentage called against the assessment roll for bond interest, bond redemption, warrant interest, warrant redemption, operation and maintenance and any other purpose for which a call is made. The board by resolution shall, prior to any call for the payment or retirement of any bonds or warrants issued subsequent to February 25, 1935, determine separately the interest requirement for bonds and warrants outstanding and shall not make a call or levy for interest payment in excess of the actual amount required stated separately. Calls made for the payment of such prior bonds and warrants issued prior to September 25, 1935, as to itemization thereof, as to the specification of the percentage called against the assessment roll for the foregoing purposes and as to the separate determination of interest requirements for the payment of outstanding bonds and warrants and as to the call or levy in amount for interest or principal payments or for the payment of funding or refunding bonds issued heretofore or hereafter to fund or to refund or to pay any of said prior warrants or bonds, shall be as provided by the statutes of Idaho in effect prior to February 25, 1935.

§ 42-2937. Assessment to pay judgment of dismissal.

In event of the dismissal of said proceedings, as hereinbefore provided, said drainage commissioners shall levy a tax upon all the real estate within said district, taking as a basis the last equalized assessment of said real estate for state and county purposes sufficient to pay said judgment and the cost of levying said tax, and shall cause said tax roll to be filed in the office of the clerk of the district court in which such judgment was rendered. If said tax is not paid within one year after the filing of said tax roll, the court shall, upon the application of any party interested, direct said real estate to be sold in payment of said tax, said sale to be made in the same manner and by the same officer as is or may be provided by law for the sale of real estate for taxes for general purposes; and the same right of redemption shall exist as in the sale of real estate for the payment of taxes for general purposes.

§ 42-2938. Construction and maintenance of drainage works — Executive powers of commissioners.

Said board of drainage commissioners hereinbefore provided for shall have the exclusive charge of the construction and maintenance of all drainage systems which heretofore have been or may be hereafter organized under the provisions of this chapter, and shall be the executive officers thereof, with full power to bind such district by their acts in the performance of their duties as provided by law.